src/morphology/affixes/acronyms.lexc
LEXICON ACRO_VIISI
!! The acronyms ending in digit 5 pronounced as number
!!€gt-norm: Acronyms 5
!!€ A5: A5+N+Sg+Nom # A5 paper
!!€ A5:een: A5+N+Sg+Ill
0  ACRO_COMPOUND   ;
+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS    ;
+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT   ;
+Pl+Nom:%>%:t ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Gen:%>%:n ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Par:%>%:tä    ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%>%:een   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%>%:ttä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%>%:ltä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%>%:llä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%>%:lle   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%>%:stä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%>%:nä    ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%>%:ssä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%>%:ksi   ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%>%:kse   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%>%:i%>ä    ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%>%:i%>in   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%>%:i%>ttä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%>%:i%>ltä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%>%:i%>llä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%>%:i%>lle  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%>%:i%>nä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%>%:i%>ne  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%>%:i%>ssä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%>%:i%>ssä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%>%:i%>n    ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>ksi  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>kse  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;

!LEXICON ACRO_KUUSI
! The acronyms ending in digit 6 pronounced as number
!0  ACRO_COMPOUND   ;
!+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
!+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_BACK_POSS    ;
!+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_BACK_CLIT   ;
!+Pl+Nom:%>%:t ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Sg+Gen:%>%:n ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Sg+Par:%>%:ta    ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ill:%>%:een   ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Sg+Abe:%>%:tta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Abl:%>%:lta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ade:%>%:lla   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+All:%>%:lle   ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ela:%>%:sta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ess:%>%:na    ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ine:%>%:ssa   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Tra:%>%:ksi   ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Sg+Tra:%>%:kse   ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
!+Pl+Par:%>%:i%>a    ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ill:%>%:i%>in   ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Pl+Abe:%>%:i%>tta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Abl:%>%:i%>lta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ade:%>%:i%>lla  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+All:%>%:i%>lle  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ess:%>%:i%>na   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Cmt:%>%:i%>ne  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ela:%>%:i%>sta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ine:%>%:i%>ssa  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ins:%>%:i%>n    ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>ksi  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>kse  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;

!LEXICON ACRO_SEITSEMÄN
! The acronyms ending in digit 7 pronounced as number
!0  ACRO_COMPOUND   ;
!+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
!+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS    ;
!+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT   ;
!+Pl+Nom:%>%:t ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Sg+Gen:%>%:n ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Sg+Par:%>%:ää    ACRO_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ill:%>%:ään   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Sg+Abe:%>%:ttä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Abl:%>%:ltä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ade:%>%:llä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+All:%>%:lle   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ela:%>%:stä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ess:%>%:nä    ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ine:%>%:ssä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Tra:%>%:ksi   ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Sg+Tra:%>%:kse   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
!+Pl+Par:%>%:i%>ä    ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ill:%>%:i%>in   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Pl+Abe:%>%:i%>ttä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Abl:%>%:i%>ltä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ade:%>%:i%>llä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+All:%>%:i%>lle  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ess:%>%:i%>nä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Cmt:%>%:i%>ne  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ela:%>%:i%>stä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ine:%>%:i%>ssä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ins:%>%:i%>n    ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>ksi  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>kse  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;

!LEXICON ACRO_KAHDEKSAN
! The acronyms ending in digit 8 pronounced as number
!0  ACRO_COMPOUND   ;
!+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
!+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_BACK_POSS    ;
!+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_BACK_CLIT   ;
!+Pl+Nom:%>%:t ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Sg+Gen:%>%:n ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Sg+Par:%>%:aa    ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ill:%>%:aan   ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Sg+Abe:%>%:tta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Abl:%>%:lta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ade:%>%:lla   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+All:%>%:lle   ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ela:%>%:sta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ess:%>%:na    ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ine:%>%:ssa   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Tra:%>%:ksi   ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Sg+Tra:%>%:kse   ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
!+Pl+Par:%>%:i%>a    ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ill:%>%:i%>in   ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Pl+Abe:%>%:i%>tta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Abl:%>%:i%>lta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ade:%>%:i%>lla  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+All:%>%:i%>lla  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ess:%>%:i%>na   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Cmt:%>%:i%>ne  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ela:%>%:i%>ssa  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ine:%>%:i%>ssa  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ins:%>%:i%>n    ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>ksi  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>kse  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
!
!LEXICON ACRO_YHDEKSÄN
! The acronyms ending in digit 9 pronounced as number
!0  ACRO_COMPOUND   ;
!+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
!+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS    ;
!+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT   ;
!+Pl+Nom:%>%:t ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Sg+Gen:%>%:n ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Sg+Par:%>%:ää    ACRO_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ill:%>%:ään   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Sg+Abe:%>%:ttä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Abl:%>%:ltä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ade:%>%:llä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+All:%>%:lle   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ela:%>%:stä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ess:%>%:nä    ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Ine:%>%:ssä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Sg+Tra:%>%:ksi   ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Sg+Tra:%>%:kse   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
!+Pl+Par:%>%:i%>ä    ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ill:%>%:i%>in   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Pl+Abe:%>%:i%>ttä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Abl:%>%:i%>ltä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ade:%>%:i%>llä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+All:%>%:i%>lle  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ess:%>%:i%>nä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Cmt:%>%:i%>ne  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ela:%>%:i%>stä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ine:%>%:i%>ssä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
!+Pl+Ins:%>%:i%>n    ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>ksi  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
!+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>kse  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;

!! !Acronyms ending in letters
!! Acronyms ending in regular alphabet may be inflected like the last letter is
!! pronounced.

LEXICON ACRO_AA
!! acronyms ending in 'a' pronounced as a letter:
!!€gt-norm: Alphabet-final acronyms
!!€ A: A+N+Sg+Nom # A
!!€ A:t: A+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ A:ssa: A+N+Sg+Ine
0  ACRO_COMPOUND   ;
+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_BACK_POSS    ;
+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_BACK_CLIT   ;
+Pl+Nom:%>%:t ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Gen:%>%:n ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Par:%>%:ta    ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%>%:han   ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%>%:tta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%>%:lta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%>%:lla   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%>%:lle   ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%>%:sta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%>%:na    ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%>%:ssa   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%>%:ksi   ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%>%:kse   ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%>%:i%>ta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%>%:i%>hin  ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%>%:i%>tta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%>%:i%>lta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%>%:i%>lla  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%>%:i%>lle  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%>%:i%>na   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%>%:i%>ne  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%>%:i%>sta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%>%:i%>ssa  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%>%:i%>n    ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>ksi  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>kse  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;

LEXICON ACRO_EE
!! acronyms ending in 'b', 'c', 'd', 'e', 'g', 'p', 'v', 'w' or 't' pronounced
!! as a letter:
!!€gt-norm: Acronyms E
!!€ BBC: BBC+N+Sg+Nom # British Broadcasting Company
!!€ BBC:t: BBC+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ BBC:ssä: BBC+N+Sg+Ine
0  ACRO_COMPOUND   ;
+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS    ;
+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT   ;
+Pl+Nom:%>%:t ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Gen:%>%:n ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Par:%>%:tä    ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%>%:hen   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%>%:ttä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%>%:ltä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%>%:llä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%>%:lle   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%>%:stä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%>%:nä    ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%>%:ssä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%>%:ksi   ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%>%:kse   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%>%:i%>tä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%>%:i%>hin  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%>%:i%>ttä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%>%:i%>ltä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%>%:i%>llä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%>%:i%>lle  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%>%:i%>nä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%>%:i%>ne  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%>%:i%>stä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%>%:i%>ssä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%>%:i%>n    ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>ksi  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>kse  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;

LEXICON ACRO_II
!! Acronyms that end in 'j' or 'i' pronoynced as letter:
!!€gt-norm: Acronyms I
!!€ DPI: DPI+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ DPI:t: DPI+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ DPI:ssä: DPI+N+Sg+Ine
0  ACRO_COMPOUND   ;
+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS    ;
+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT   ;
+Pl+Nom:%>%:t ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Gen:%>%:n ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Par:%>%:tä    ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%>%:hin   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%>%:ttä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%>%:ltä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%>%:llä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%>%:lle   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%>%:stä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%>%:nä    ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%>%:ssä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%>%:ksi   ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%>%:kse   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%>%:i%>tä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%>%:i%>hin  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%>%:i%>ttä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%>%:i%>ltä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%>%:i%>llä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%>%:i%>lle  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%>%:i%>nä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%>%:i%>ne  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%>%:i%>stä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%>%:i%>ssä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%>%:i%>n    ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>ksi  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>kse  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
